Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-710 Power to avoid transfers.
The property liable for the payment of unsecured debts of a decedent includes
all property transferred by the decedent by any means which is in law void or
voidable as against the decedent's creditors, and subject to prior liens, the
right to recover this property, so far as necessary for the payment of
unsecured debts of the decedent, is exclusively in the personal representative.
[L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next